src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON OPT-53
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.53@+Opt+ScPl2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.53@%>%{оеэØ%}зсынк VerbEnd_lak-ImpK ;

LEXICON OPT-54
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@+Opt+ScPl2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@%>%{оеэØ%}змизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON OPT-56
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.56@+Opt+ScPl2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.56@%>%{оеэØ%}зсынк VerbEnd_lak-ImpK ;

LEXICON OPT-60
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.60@+Opt+ScPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.60@%>%{оеэØ%}ст VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.60@+Opt+ScPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.60@%>%{оеэØ%}зт VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON OPT-61
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@%>%{оеэØ%}змизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@%>%{оеэØ%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@%>%{иы%}змизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@%>%{иы%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON OPT-62
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.62@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.62@%>%{оеэØ%}зтадызь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.62@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.62@%>%{оеэØ%}стадызь VerbEnd_ImpK ;

@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.62@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.62@%>%{оеэØ%}дызь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.62@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.62@%>%{иы%}дизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.62@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.62@%>%{иы%}дезь VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON OPT-63
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@%>%{оеэØ%}сызь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@%>%{оеэØ%}зсызь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@%>%{оеэØ%}ссызь VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON OPT-64
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{оеэØ%}змизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{оеэØ%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{иы%}змизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{иы%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON OPT-65
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.65@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.65@%>%{иы%}дизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.65@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.65@%>дызь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.65@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.65@%>%{иы%}дезь VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON OPT-66
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@%>%{оеэØ%}сызь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@%>%{оеэØ%}зсызь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@%>%{оеэØ%}ссызь VerbEnd_ImpK ;



LEXICON Optative-noArrow
 OPT-10 ;
 OPT-20 ;
 OPT-30 ;
 OPT-40 ;
 OPT-50 ;
 OPT-60 ;
!! Given in Grammar 2000
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ Optative1_A_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.13@ Optative1_A_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.16@ Optative1_A_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.23@ Optative1_A_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.26@ Optative1_A_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.33@ Optative1_A_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.36@ Optative1_A_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.43@ Optative1_A_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.46@ Optative1_A_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.53@ Optative1_A_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.56@ Optative1_A_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.63@ Optative1_A_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.66@ Optative1_A_Obj ;

LEXICON Optative1_A_Obj
 OPT-12 ;
 OPT-13 ;
 OPT-15 ;
 OPT-16 ;
 OPT-21 ;
 OPT-23 ;
 OPT-24 ;
 OPT-26 ;
 OPT-31 ;
 OPT-32 ;
 OPT-33 ;
 OPT-34 ;
 OPT-35 ;
 OPT-36 ;


!LEXICON Nouns_Voiceless
!Nouns_Pl ;
!Nouns_Shibilant ;


!LEXICON Nouns_Shibilant
!+Ill+Indef:%>с VerbEnd_K ;
!+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

!LEXICON Nouns_Pl
!+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses-NomPl ;
!+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тнЕ3%>втеме _KUDO-Tenses-Obl  ;
!+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>де _KUDO-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Pl+Com+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нек VerbEnd_K-lak ;
!+Pl+Cmpr+Def:%>тнЕ3%>шка _KUDO-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нень VerbEnd_K ;
!+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тнЕ3%>стэ _KUDO-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нь VerbEnd_K ;
!+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тнЕ3%>с VerbEnd_K ;
!+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тнЕ3%>сэ _KUDO-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Pl+Lat+Def:%>тнЕ3%>в VerbEnd_K ;
!+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тнЕ3 _KUDO-Tenses-NomPl ;
!+Pl+Prl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>ва _KUDO-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тнЕ3%>кс _OSH-Tenses-Obl ;




!LEXICON _OSH-Possessive-Before-K-or-K-4Inf 
! VerbEnd_K ;
! _OSH-Possessive-Before-K-4Inf ;

LEXICON _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K-or-K-4Inf 
 VerbEnd_K ;
 _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K-4Inf ;
 SG-GEN-DEF ;!кутморямстонть

!LEXICON _OSH-Possessive-Before-K-4Inf
!:%>%{оеэØ%} Possessive-Before-K-noArrow-4Inf ;

LEXICON _KUDO-Possessive-Before-K-4Inf
:%> Possessive-Before-K-noArrow-4Inf ;

LEXICON Possessive-Before-K-noArrow-4Inf
+PxSg1:%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} VerbEnd_K ;
+PxSg1+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:%{оеэØ%}м VerbEnd_K ;
+PxSg2:%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} VerbEnd_K ;
+PxSg2+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%} VerbEnd_K ;
+PxSg3:%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} VerbEnd_K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+PxSg3:%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} VerbEnd_K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+PxSg3:%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} VerbEnd_K ;
+PxPl1:%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к VerbEnd_K-lak ;
+PxPl2:%{оеэØ%}нк VerbEnd_K-lak ;
+PxPl3:%{оеэØ%}ст VerbEnd_K ;





!! Used with deverbals
LEXICON _KAL-Tenses1
: _KAL-Tenses-NomSg ;
 _KAL-Tenses-NomPl ;

LEXICON _KAL-Tenses-NomSg
 VerbEnd_K ;
+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg3: VerbEnd_K ;
+Clt/Cop: _KAL-Tenses-NomSg-noClt ;

LEXICON _KAL-Tenses-NomSg-noClt
+Prs+ScSg1:%>%{АЯ%}н VerbEnd_K ;
+Prs+ScSg2:%>%{АЯ%}т VerbEnd_K ;
+Prt2+ScSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}линь VerbEnd_K ;
+Prt2+ScSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}лить VerbEnd_K ;
+Prt2+ScSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}ль VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON _KAL-Tenses-NomPl
 VerbEnd_K ;
+Clt/Cop: _KAL-Tenses-NomPl-noClt ;

LEXICON _KAL-Tenses-NomPl-noClt
+Prs+ScPl1:%>т%{АЯ%}но VerbEnd_K ;
+Prs+ScPl2:%>т%{АЯ%}до VerbEnd_K ;
+Prs+ScPl3: VerbEnd_K ;
+Prt2+ScPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}линек VerbEnd_K-lak ;
+Prt2+ScPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}лиде VerbEnd_K ;
+Prt2+ScPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}льть VerbEnd_K ;

!LEXICON _KAL-Tenses-Abs
!+Prt2+ScPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}линек VerbEnd_K-lak ;
!+Prt2+ScPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}лиде VerbEnd_K ;
!+Prt2+ScPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}льть VerbEnd_K ;
! _KAL-Tenses-Abs-1 ;

!LEXICON _KAL-Tenses-Abs-1
!+Prs+ScPl1:%>т%{АЯ%}но VerbEnd_K ;
!+Prs+ScPl2:%>т%{АЯ%}до VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON _KAL-Tenses-Obl
 VerbEnd_K ;
+Prs+ScSg3: VerbEnd_K ;
 _KAL-Tenses-Obl-noClt ;

LEXICON _KAL-Tenses-Obl-noClt
+Prs+ScSg1:%>%{АЯ%}н VerbEnd_K ;
+Prs+ScSg2:%>%{АЯ%}т VerbEnd_K ;
+Prs+ScPl1:%>т%{АЯ%}но VerbEnd_K ;
+Prs+ScPl2:%>т%{АЯ%}до VerbEnd_K ;
+Prs+ScPl3:%>т%{ЬØ%} VerbEnd_K ;
+Prt2+ScSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}линь VerbEnd_K ;
+Prt2+ScSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}лить VerbEnd_K ;
+Prt2+ScSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}ль VerbEnd_K ;
+Prt2+ScPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}линек VerbEnd_K-lak ;
+Prt2+ScPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}лиде VerbEnd_K ;
+Prt2+ScPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}льть VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON _OSH-Tenses1
 _KAL-Tenses-NomSg ;
 _KAL-Tenses-NomPl ;

!LEXICON _OSH-Tenses-Abs
! _KAL-Tenses-Abs ;

!LEXICON _OSH-Tenses-Obl
! _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON _LAK-Tenses1
 _LAK-Tenses-NomSg ;
 _LAK-Tenses-NomPl ;

LEXICON _LAK-Tenses-NomSg
+Prs+ScSg3: VerbEnd_K-lak ;
 _KAL-Tenses-NomSg-noClt ;
 VerbEnd_K-lak ;

LEXICON _LAK-Tenses-NomPl
 VerbEnd_K-lak ;
 _KAL-Tenses-NomPl-noClt ;

!LEXICON _LAK-Tenses-Abs
! _KAL-Tenses-Abs ;

!LEXICON _LAK-Tenses-Abs-1
!+Prs+ScPl1:%>т%{АЯ%}но VerbEnd_K ;
!+Prs+ScPl2:%>т%{АЯ%}до VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON _LAK-Tenses-Obl
 VerbEnd_K-lak ;
 _KAL-Tenses-Obl-noClt ;
+Prs+ScSg3: VerbEnd_K-lak ;

LEXICON _KIT-Tenses1
 _KIT-Tenses-NomSg ;
 _KIT-Tenses-NomPl ;

LEXICON _KIT-Tenses-NomSg
 _KAL-Tenses-NomSg ;

LEXICON _KIT-Tenses-NomPl
 _KAL-Tenses-NomPl ;
!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/SH+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>TLossт%{АЯ%}но VerbEnd_K ;
!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/SH+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:%>TLossт%{АЯ%}до VerbEnd_K ;

!LEXICON _KIT-Tenses-Abs
! _KAL-Tenses-Abs ;

!LEXICON _KIT-Tenses-Abs-1
! _KAL-Tenses-Abs-1 ;
!!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/SH+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>TLossт%{АЯ%}но VerbEnd_K ;
!!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/SH+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:%>TLossт%{АЯ%}до VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON _KIT-Tenses-Obl
 _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;
!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/SH+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>TLossт%{АЯ%}но VerbEnd_K ;
!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/SH+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:%>TLossт%{АЯ%}до VerbEnd_K ;


LEXICON V-DEFECTIVE-IMPRT
 V-DEFECTIVE-IMPRT-SG2 ;
:%>дО1 V-DEFECTIVE-IMPRT-PL2 ;
LEXICON V-DEFECTIVE-IMPRT-SG2
+Imprt+ScSg2: ImpK ;
:%>Г4а V-DEFECTIVE-PREC-SG2 ;
LEXICON V-DEFECTIVE-IMPRT-PL2
+Imprt+ScPl2: ImpK ;
:%>Г4а V-DEFECTIVE-PREC-PL2 ;
LEXICON V-DEFECTIVE-PREC-SG2
+Prec+ScSg2: ENDLEX ;
LEXICON V-DEFECTIVE-PREC-PL2
+Prec+ScPl2: ENDLEX ;


LEXICON ImpK
 ENDLEX ;

+Clt/Ga:%>Г4а ENDLEX ;
+Clt/Gaka:%>Г4ака ENDLEX ;
+Clt/Gakaja:%>Г4акая ENDLEX ;
+Clt/Gaja:%>Г4ая ENDLEX ;
+Clt/Gajatj:%>Г4аять ENDLEX ;
+Clt/Gajatja:%>Г4аятя ENDLEX ;
+Clt/Gatja:%>Г4атя ENDLEX ;
!2014-01-21!+Clt/Gak:%>Г4ак ENDLEX ;


LEXICON VerbEnd_ImpK
 VerbEnd ;
 VerbEnd_ImpK_01 ;
LEXICON VerbEnd_ImpK_01
!! ваномс+V+Imprt+ScPl2+Clt/Ga: **look/katsoa**
!!€ ван%>%{оеэØ%}дО1%>Г4а
!!€ ван%>одо%>0я
+Clt/AddGak:%>Г1ак ENDLEX ;
+Clt/AddGak:%>Г4ак ENDLEX ;
+Clt/Ga:%>Г4а ENDLEX ; !2020-04-06 but now testing 2024-12-23
+Clt/Gaka:%>Г4ака ENDLEX ;
+Clt/Gakaja:%>Г4акая ENDLEX ;
+Clt/Gaja:%>Г4ая ENDLEX ;
+Clt/Gajatj:%>Г4аять ENDLEX ;
+Clt/Gajatja:%>Г4аятя ENDLEX ;
+Clt/Gatja:%>Г4атя ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VerbEnd_lak-ImpK
 VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 VerbEnd_K-lak ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Clt/Ga:%>KLossГ4а ENDLEX ; 2020-04-06
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Clt/Gaka:%>KLossГ4ака ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Clt/Gakaja:%>KLossГ4акая ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Clt/Gaj:%>KLossГ4ая ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Clt/Gajatj:%>KLossГ4аять ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Clt/Gajatja:%>KLossГ4аятя ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Clt/Gatja:%>KLossГ4атя ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Clt/AddGak:%>KLossГ4ак ENDLEX ;


!LEXICON Phrase_V
!: # ;

LEXICON V_PAIRS
: # ;

!LEXICON V-IMPRT-SCSG2-DIMIN_
!!аштека
!+Imprt+ScSg2: # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
